Nevada, session 83, AB318.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 694C.300 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
694C.300 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
captive insurer licensed pursuant to this chapter may transact any
form of insurance described in NRS 681A.020 to 681A.080,
inclusive.
2. A captive insurer licensed pursuant to this chapter:
(a) Shall not directly provide personal motor vehicle or
homeowners’ insurance coverage, or any component thereof.
(b) Shall not accept or cede reinsurance, except as otherwise
provided in NRS 694C.350.
(c) May directly provide workers’ compensation insurance.
(d) May provide excess workers’ compensation insurance to its
parent and affiliated companies, unless otherwise prohibited by the
laws of the state in which the insurance is transacted.
[(d)] (e) May reinsure workers’ compensation insurance
provided pursuant to a program of self-funded insurance of its
parent and affiliated companies if:
(1) The parent or affiliated company which is providing the
self-funded insurance is certified as a self-insured employer by the
Commissioner, if the insurance is being transacted in this State; or
(2) The program of self-funded insurance is otherwise
qualified pursuant to, or in compliance with, the laws of the state in
which the insurance is transacted.
3. A pure captive insurer shall not insure any risks other than
those of its parent and affiliated companies or controlled unaffiliated
businesses.
4. An association captive insurer shall not insure any risks
other than those of the member organizations of its association and
the affiliated companies of the member organizations.
5. A state-chartered risk retention group shall not insure any
risks other than those of the members of its association.
6. An agency captive insurer shall not insure any risks other
than those of the policies that are placed by or through the insurance
agency or brokerage that owns the captive insurer.
-
*AB318*

– 3 –
7. A rental captive insurer shall not insure any risks other than
those of the policyholders or associations that have entered into
agreements with the rental captive insurer for the insurance of those
risks. Such agreements must be in a form which has been approved
by the Commissioner.
8. A sponsored captive insurer shall not insure any risks other
than those of its participants.
9. As used in this section, “excess workers’ compensation
insurance” means insurance in excess of the specified per-incident
or aggregate limit, if any, established by:
(a) The Commissioner, if the insurance is being transacted in
this State; or
(b) The chief regulatory officer for insurance in the state in
which the insurance is being transacted.
Sec. 2. NRS 694C.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
694C.380 [A]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a captive
insurer shall not join or contribute financially to an assigned risk
pool or insurance insolvency guaranty fund in this state. A captive
insurer or its insured, its parent or an affiliated company, or any
member organization of its association shall not receive any benefit
from such a pool or fund for claims arising out of the operations of
the captive insurer.
2. The Commissioner may authorize or require a captive
insurer that directly provides workers’ compensation insurance to
join or contribute financially to an assigned risk pool or insurance
insolvency guaranty fund in this State. A captive insurer that joins
or contributes financially to an assigned risk pool or insurance
insolvency guaranty fund in this State may receive any benefit
from such a pool or fund for claims arising out of the operations
of the captive insurer relating to the provision of workers’
compensation insurance as the Commissioner may authorize.
Sec. 3. NRS 616A.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616A.290 “Private carrier” means any insurer , including,
without limitation, a captive insurer, or the legal representative of
an insurer authorized to provide industrial insurance pursuant to
chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS. The term does not include
a self-insured employer or an association of self-insured public or
private employers.
Sec. 4. NRS 616B.463 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616B.463 1. Before a private carrier may provide industrial
insurance pursuant to chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS, the
private carrier must be authorized by the Commissioner pursuant to
[chapter] :
-
*AB318*

– 4 –
(a) Chapter 680A of NRS and maintain such security of the
kind described in NRS 680A.120 and 680A.140 as may be required
[.] ; or
(b) Chapter 694C of NRS and maintain such security of the
kind described in NRS 694C.250 as may be required.
2. A private carrier shall not provide industrial insurance
pursuant to chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS as an
unauthorized insurer pursuant to subsection 9 of NRS 680A.070.
3. A private carrier that is authorized by the Commissioner to
provide industrial insurance pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1:
(a) Constitutes an authorized insurer, as that term is defined in
NRS 679A.030; and
(b) Is subject to the provisions of title 57 of NRS that govern
authorized insurers.
H
-
*AB318*